Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2269.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XXII-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is repealed:[ARTICLE XXII-A.MEDICAL EDUCATION LOAN ASSISTANCE.(a) General Provisions.Section 2201-A. Scope.This article deals with medical education loan assistance.Section 2202-A. Purpose.The purpose of this article is to provide an incentive to Pennsylvania students to pursue higher education and training in 12345678910111213141516171819 medicine, professional nursing, biomedicine and the life sciences in order to maintain the delivery of quality health care services in this Commonwealth.Section 2203-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accredited medical college." An institution of higher education located in this Commonwealth that is accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education to provide courses in medicine and empowered to grant professional and academic degrees in medicine as defined in the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985."Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Approved institution of higher learning." An institution of higher learning located in this Commonwealth and approved by the agency."Approved nursing program." An institution located in this Commonwealth and accredited to grant professional and academic degrees or diplomas in nursing as defined in the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law."Degree in medicine." A degree from an accredited medical college that qualifies the degree recipient to be licensed as a physician."Designated area." Any of the following:(1) A geographic area of this Commonwealth that is designated by the Secretary of Health as having a shortage of physicians.(2) A geographic area of this Commonwealth designated by 20260HB2269PN2968 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the United States Department of Health and Human Services as a medically underserved area or designated to have a medically underserved population."Eligible applicant." An individual who holds an undergraduate degree from an institution of higher learning and is enrolled in:(1) an accredited medical college; or(2) an approved institution of higher learning for purposes of obtaining a graduate degree in biomedicine or life sciences."Guarantor." An insurance company or not-for-profit guarantor whose primary purpose is to provide default coverage and loss prevention services to an offeror of unsecured student loans."Licensed health care facility." A health care facility that is enrolled in the Commonwealth's medical assistance program and is licensed under Article X of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Public Welfare Code, or the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Nursing school applicant." An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and is enrolled in an approved nursing program."Offeror." An institution that makes unsecured loans to eligible students in cooperation with the agency."Physician." An individual licensed to practice medicine and surgery within the scope of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985."Registered nurse." An individual licensed to practice 20260HB2269PN2968 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional nursing under the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law."Work requirement for nurses." Postgraduate, full-time employment in direct patient care with a licensed health care facility located in this Commonwealth in an occupation related to an approved course of study. The term does not include a paid student internship, a paid fellowship, volunteer service or employment before graduation.(b) Program.Section 2211-A. Pennsylvania Medical Education Loan Assistance Program.The agency shall establish and administer the Pennsylvania Medical Education Loan Assistance Program as set forth in sections 2212-A and 2213-A to provide financial assistance to individuals who acquire the required degree or diploma in medicine, professional nursing, biomedicine or life sciences and to recruit these individuals to practice their professions in Pennsylvania.Section 2212-A. Loan guarantor program.(a) Establishment of program.--The agency shall administer a loan guarantor program on a Statewide basis. The agency shall utilize funds in the Medical School Loan Account to encourage eligible applicants to attend an accredited medical college or an approved institution of higher learning.(b) Loan Guarantor Program.--The Loan Guarantor Program shall provide for the following:(1) Life of loan servicing.(2) Contracting for insurance with a guarantor, approved by the agency, which offers a low-cost loan with competitive interest rates and loan fees to eligible applicants.20260HB2269PN2968 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Predetermining the eligibility of applicants who receive a loan from an offeror to attend an accredited medical school or an approved institution of higher learning that is insured by a guarantor.(4) Evaluating the benefit package of a guarantor for adequacy, accessibility and availability of funds necessary to provide adequate loss prevention.(c) Low-cost loans.--An eligible applicant shall apply to an offeror for a low-cost loan to attend an accredited medical college or an approved institution of higher learning. A low-cost loan made under this subsection shall be guaranteed by an approved guarantor through a contract with the agency. Low-cost loans made under this subsection shall provide reduced interest rates and loan fees to eligible applicants compared to loans made for the same purpose that are not guaranteed by this article.(d) Loan requirements.--Loans provided under this section shall cover up to 100% of the actual cost of tuition, room and board at an accredited medical college or an approved institution of higher learning and the actual cost of course-required textbooks and supplies for the recipient.(e) Default.--If a recipient fails to repay a loan received under this section, the agency shall collect the loan pursuant to one of the following:(1) Section 4.3 of the act of August 7, 1963 (P.L.549, No.290), referred to as the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency Act.(2) A process established by the applicable guarantors.(3) Any other collection procedure or process deemed appropriate by the agency.20260HB2269PN2968 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Medical Education Loan Loss Account.--An account is hereby established within the agency to receive funds appropriated for purposes of this section. Moneys in the account are hereby appropriated to the agency to provide the loan guarantor program. When funds in the account are expended, no additional loans shall be offered.(g) Interest rate reduction.--The agency or an offeror may modify loans under this section to further reduce interest rates as follows:(1) The agency or the offeror may reduce the interest rate of the loan by not less than 1% if the loan recipient, upon completion of a graduate degree in biomedicine or life sciences or upon licensure as a physician, agrees to practice medicine or be employed to conduct research on a full-time basis in Pennsylvania for a period of three consecutive years.(2) The agency or the offeror may reduce the interest rate of the loan by not less than 2% if the loan recipient, upon licensure as a physician, agrees to practice medicine for not less than three consecutive years in a designated area.(h) Contract.--In addition to the requirements of subsection (g), in order to be eligible for an interest rate reduction, a loan recipient shall enter into a contract with the agency or an offeror or its assigns at the time the loan is made. The contract shall include the following:(1) The loan recipient practicing in a designated area shall agree to treat patients eligible for medical assistance and Medicare.(2) The loan recipient shall permit the agency or the 20260HB2269PN2968 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offeror to monitor the recipient's practice or employment to determine compliance with the terms of the contract and this article.(3) The agency shall certify compliance with the terms of the contract.(4) Upon the loan recipient's death or total or permanent disability, the agency or the offeror shall nullify the service obligation of the recipient.(5) If the loan recipient is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a felony or if the licensing board has determined that the recipient has committed an act of gross negligence in the performance of service obligations or has suspended or revoked the license to practice, the agency or the offeror shall terminate the loan recipient's participation in the program and seek repayment of the amount of the loan on the date of the conviction, determination, suspension or revocation.(6) A loan recipient who fails to comply with a contract shall pay to the agency or the offeror the amount of loan received under the original contract as of the time of default. Providing false information or misrepresentation on an application or verification of service shall constitute default.(i) Accountability.--In July 2004, the agency shall conduct a performance review of the program and services provided. The performance review shall include the following:(1) The goals and objectives of the program.(2) A determination of whether the goals and objectives were achieved by the agency-participating guarantor and offeror.20260HB2269PN2968 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The specific methodology used to evaluate the results.(4) Recommendations for improvement.Section 2213-A. Loan forgiveness program.(a) Establishment of program.--The agency shall administer a loan forgiveness program for nursing school applicants on a Statewide basis. The agency may provide loan forgiveness as provided in subsection (b) for recipients of loans who by contract with the agency agree to practice professional nursing in this Commonwealth upon attainment of the required license.(b) Loan forgiveness.--Agency-administered, federally insured student loans for higher education provided to a nursing school applicant may be forgiven by the agency as follows:(1) The agency may forgive 50% of the loan, not to exceed $50,000, if a loan recipient enters into a contract with the agency that requires the recipient upon successful completion of an approved nursing program and licensure as a registered nurse to practice nursing in this Commonwealth for a period of not less than three consecutive years.(2) Loan forgiveness awards made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be forgiven over a period of three years at an annual rate of 33 1/3% of the award and shall be made from funds appropriated for this purpose.(3) The contract entered into with the agency pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be considered a contract with the Commonwealth and shall include the following terms:(i) An unlicensed recipient shall apply for a registered nurse's license to practice in this Commonwealth at the earliest practicable opportunity upon successfully completing a degree in nursing.20260HB2269PN2968 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Within six months after licensure, a recipient shall engage in the practice of nursing in this Commonwealth according to the terms of the loan forgiveness award.(iii) The recipient shall agree to practice in a licensed health care facility in the provision of direct patient care on a full-time basis.(iv) The recipient shall permit the agency to determine compliance with the work requirement for nurses and all other terms of the contract.(v) Upon the recipient's death or total or permanent disability, the agency shall nullify the service obligation of the recipient.(vi) If the recipient is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a felony or if the licensing board has determined that the recipient has committed an act of gross negligence in the performance of service obligations or has suspended or revoked the license to practice, the agency shall have the authority to terminate the recipient's service in the program and demand repayment of the amount of the loan as of the date of the conviction, determination, suspension or revocation.(vii) Loan recipients who fail to begin or complete the obligations contracted for shall pay to the agency the amount of the loan received under the terms of the contract pursuant to this section. Providing false information or misrepresentation on an application or verification of service shall be deemed a default. Determination as to the time of default shall be made by 20260HB2269PN2968 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the agency.(4) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 8127 (relating to personal earnings exempt from process), the agency may seek garnishment of wages in order to collect the amount of the loan following default under paragraph (3)(vii).Section 2214-A. Tax applicability.Loan forgiveness repayments received by a student shall not be considered taxable income for purposes of Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(c) Miscellaneous Provisions.Section 2231-A. Annual report.(a) Development of report.--The agency shall publish a report by September 1, 2002, and every year thereafter for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report shall include information regarding the operation of the programs established under this article, including:(1) The number and amount of loan guarantees and loan contracts executed and renewed for eligible applicants in medicine, biomedicine or life sciences and the nursing loan forgiveness program.(2) The number and amount of nursing loan forgiveness contracts executed and renewed for nursing school applicants.(3) The number of defaulted nursing loan forgiveness contracts, reported by cause.(4) The number of nurses participating in the nursing loan forgiveness program, reported by type of institution attended, including four-year educational institutions, community colleges, independent two-year colleges, private licensed schools, hospital-based courses of study and 20260HB2269PN2968 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certificate programs.(5) The number and type of enforcement actions taken by the agency.(b) Submission.--The annual report shall be submitted to the Governor, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Public Health and Welfare Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2232-A. Appeals.The provisions of this article shall be subject to 22 Pa. Code Ch. 121 (relating to student financial aid).Section 2233-A. Regulations.The agency shall adopt regulations and procedures necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.Section 2234-A. Funding.Loan guarantor program payments and loan forgiveness repayments shall be made only to the extent that funds are appropriated for that purpose and are sufficient to cover administration of the programs. The receipt of a loan under this article shall not constitute an entitlement derived from the Commonwealth or a claim on any funds of the Commonwealth.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2269PN2968 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627